Massachusetts, session 194th, H557.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 25, after the words “any period of six
months”, the following:-
“, provided that a school shall excuse absences due to mental health symptoms in the
same manner that absences are excused for physical health symptoms. Likewise, any
requirement for documentation, either from a parent or health professional, shall be consistent
for absence due to mental health symptoms as for physical health symptoms. When
documentation is required of a healthcare professional, a school shall accept documentation from
licensed mental health care professionals in the same manner as documentation from other health
care professionals. A child who is absent due to mental or behavioral health shall be offered the
opportunity to meet with a certified school counselor upon return to school, but shall not be
required to do so.”
of 1